Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1676.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1290.2, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 160, O.S.L. 2023 (21 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 1290.2), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1290.2.


DEFINITIONS


A. As used in the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act:


1. “Completed application” means all fields are completed, all


questions are answered and the required signatures are present on


the application for a handgun license, and the required documents


are attached to the application, including legible fingerprints, if


applicable;



Req. No. 3140 Page 1


2. “Concealed firearm” means a loaded or unloaded firearm not


openly visible to the ordinary observation of a reasonable person;


3. “Unconcealed firearm” or “open carry” means a loaded or


unloaded firearm that is carried upon the person where the firearm


is visible, or carried upon the person using a holster, scabbard, or


sling or case;


4. “Pistol” or “handgun” shall have the same definition as


provided in Section 1289.3 of this title;


5. “Rifle” shall have the same definition as provided in


Section 1289.4 of this title; and


6. “Shotgun” shall have the same definition as provided in


Section 1289.5 of this title.


B. The definition of pistol or handgun for purposes of the


Oklahoma Self-Defense Act shall not apply to imitation pistols,


flare guns, underwater fishing guns, or blank pistols.


C. Pistols, handguns, rifles, shotguns, and all other lawful


firearms mentioned in the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act may collectively


be referred to as “firearms”.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3140 CN 1/14/2026 9:53:04 AM







Req. No. 3140 Page 2